Washington statutes.
RCW 39.12.120

Payroll records—Filing—Noncompliance.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1821-S.SL) ***

(1) Each contractor, subcontractor, or employer shall keep accurate payroll records for three years from the date of acceptance of the public works project by the contract awarding agency, showing the employee's full name, address, social security number, trade or occupation, classification, straight and overtime rates, hourly rate of usual benefits, and hours worked each day and week, including any employee authorizations executed pursuant to RCW 49.28.065, and the actual gross wages, itemized deductions, withholdings, and net wages paid, for each laborer, worker, and mechanic employed by the contractor for work performed on a public works project.

(2) A contractor, subcontractor, or employer shall file a copy of its certified payroll records using the department of labor and industries' online system at least once per month. If the department of labor and industries' online system is not used, a contractor, subcontractor, or employer shall file a copy of its certified payroll records directly with the department of labor and industries in a format approved by the department of labor and industries at least once per month.

(3) A contractor, subcontractor, or employer's noncompliance with this section constitutes a violation of RCW 39.12.050.

[2019 c 242 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Findings—2019 c 242: See notes following RCW 39.12.010.